Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Foreign Corporations.

Sec. 10.20.455.
Certificate of authority required.

A foreign nonprofit corporation may not transact business in the state until it has procured a certificate of authority from the commissioner.
A foreign corporation may not procure a certificate of authority to transact business in the state that a corporation organized under this chapter is not permitted to transact.
A foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the state or country under which it is organized governing its organization and internal affairs differ from the laws of the state.
Nothing in this chapter authorizes the state to regulate the organization or the internal affairs of a foreign corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 1 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 968 et seq.

Sec. 10.20.460.
Activities not constituting transacting business in the state.

Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in the state, a foreign corporation does not transact business in the state by carrying on any of the following activities:

maintaining or defending any action or suit or an administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting its settlement or the settlement of claims or disputes;

holding meetings of its directors, shareholders, or members or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

maintaining bank accounts;

securing or collecting debts, or enforcing rights in property securing debts;

transacting business in interstate commerce;

granting funds;

distributing information to members;

conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of 30 days not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 17 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 the words “or members” were inserted in (2) of this section to correct a manifest error of omission in ch. 99, SLA 1968.

Sec. 10.20.465.
Equal status as domestic corporations.

A foreign corporation that has received a certificate of authority enjoys the same, but no greater, rights and privileges as a domestic corporation organized for the purposes set out in the application under which the certificate of authority is issued and, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, is subject to the duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities imposed upon a domestic corporation of like character.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.470.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

A certificate of authority may not be issued to a foreign corporation unless the corporate name of the corporation

does not contain a word or phrase that indicates or implies that it is organized for any purpose other than the purpose contained in its articles of incorporation;

is available for use by the foreign corporation under AS

10.20.021(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 42 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 13, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 150 et seq.

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state. 26 ALR3d 994.

Sec. 10.20.471.
Assumed corporate name.

When a foreign corporation, applying for a certificate of authority, has a name that is not available for use by the foreign corporation under AS

10.20.021(b)

, it shall

select a name under which it elects to do business in the state;

clearly identify on all advertising, contracts, and other legal documents its true corporate name as well as its assumed name.

History.

(§ 43 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 14 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For applicability of amendment to this section made by § 14, ch. 50, SLA 1999, see § 36(a) and (b), ch. 50, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.20.475.
Change of name by foreign corporation.

When a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state changes its name to one under which a certificate of authority would not be granted to it, the certificate of authority of the corporation is suspended and it may not transact business in the state until it has changed its name to a name available to it under the laws of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.480.
Application for certificate of authority.

To procure a certificate of authority to transact business in the state, a foreign corporation shall file an application in duplicate with the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.485.
Contents of application.

The application must set out

the name of the corporation and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

the date of incorporation and the period of duration of the corporation;

the address of the principal office of the corporation in the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

the address of the proposed registered office of the corporation in this state, and the name of its proposed registered agent in this state at that address;

the purpose or purposes of the corporation that it proposes to pursue in conducting its affairs in the state;

the names and addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

additional information which may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the commissioner to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in the state;

the name and address of a person owning at least five percent of the shares, or five percent of any class of shares, and the percentage of the shares or class of shares owned by that person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 44 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Sec. 10.20.490.
Form and execution of application.

The application must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner and shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 35 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.495.
Filing of application for certificate of authority.

Upon finding that the application conforms to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid

endorse on each document the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original of the application in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of authority to transact business in the state and affix the other duplicate original application to it.

The certificate of authority, together with the duplicate original of the application affixed to it by the commissioner, shall be returned to the corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.500.
Effect of certificate of authority.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of authority by the commissioner, the corporation may transact business in the state for the purpose set out in its application, subject, however, to the right of the state to suspend or revoke the authority as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.505.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state shall have and continuously maintain in the state a registered

office which may be, but need not be, the same as its place of business in the state;

agent, who may be either an individual resident in the state whose business office is identical with the registered office or a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state, which has a business office identical with the registered office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.510.
List of foreign corporations and registered offices and agents.

The commissioner shall provide each clerk of the superior court with a current list of the names of all foreign corporations, the address of their registered office, and the name and address of their registered agent. The commissioner shall provide a supplement to the list indicating additions, deletions, and changes at least every six months.
The list shall be made available to the public by the commissioner for a fee prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.515.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state may change its registered office or change its registered agent, or both, upon filing with the department a statement setting out

the name of the corporation;

the address of its registered office;

if the address of its registered office is to be changed, the address of the proposed office;

the name of its registered agent;

if its registered agent is to be changed, the name of its successor registered agent;

that the address of its registered office and the address of the business office or its registered agent, as changed, will be identical;

that the change is authorized by resolution adopted by the board of directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.520.
Execution, filing, and effective date of statement.

The statement shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the statement conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall file the statement in the commissioner’s office, and, upon filing the statement, the change of address of the registered office, or the change of registered agent, or both, becomes effective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 36 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.525.
Service of process on foreign corporation.

The registered agent appointed by a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state shall be an agent of the corporation upon whom process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the corporation may be served.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Collateral references. —

36
Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations, § 476 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations, § 1030 et seq.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent. 17 ALR3d 625.

Sec. 10.20.530.
Service on commissioner.

When a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state, or not authorized to transact business in the state but doing so, fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the state, or when a registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, or when the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation is suspended or revoked, the commissioner is an agent upon whom process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the commissioner shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the commissioner, or the commissioner’s designee, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand, accompanied by a fee established by the department by regulation. The commissioner shall immediately have one copy forwarded by registered or certified mail, addressed to the corporation at its principal office in the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated. Service on the commissioner is returnable in not less than 30 days.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 45 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 57 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 17 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 14, SLA 2005 (SB 52), see 2005 Senate Journal 42 — 43.

Sec. 10.20.535.
Records of commissioner.

The commissioner shall keep a record of all processes, notices, or demands served under AS

10.20.525

and

10.20.530

, and shall record the time of service and the commissioner’s action with reference to the service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.540.
Procedure not exclusive.

Nothing in AS

10.20.525

—

10.20.535

limits or affects the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a corporation in any other manner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.545.
Amendment of articles of incorporation of foreign corporation.

When the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state are amended, the foreign corporation shall, within 30 days after the amendment becomes effective, file with the department a copy of the amendment authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated.
The filing of the amendment does not enlarge or alter the purpose that the corporation may pursue in the transaction of business in the state, nor authorize the corporation to transact business in the state under a name other than the name set out in its certificate of authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.550.
Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state.

When a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the state or country where it is incorporated, and the corporation is the surviving corporation, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, file with the commissioner a copy of the articles of merger authenticated by the proper office of the state or country under whose laws the statutory merger was carried out.
It is not necessary for the corporation to procure either a new or amended certificate of authority to transact business in the state unless the name of the corporation is changed or unless the corporation desires to pursue in the state other or additional purposes than those that it is authorized to conduct in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.555.
When amended certificate of authority required.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state shall procure an amended certificate of authority if it changes its corporate name, or desires to pursue in the state other or additional purposes than those set out in its earlier application for a certificate of authority, by making application to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.560.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state may withdraw from the state upon procuring from the commissioner a certificate of withdrawal.
To procure a certificate of withdrawal, the foreign corporation shall deliver to the commissioner an application for withdrawal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.565.
Contents of application for withdrawal.

The application for withdrawal must set out

the name of the corporation and the state or country where it is incorporated;

that the corporation is not transacting business in the state;

that the corporation surrenders its authority to transact business in the state;

that the corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent in the state to accept service of process and consents that service of process in an action, suit, or proceeding based upon a cause of action arising in the state during the time the corporation was authorized to transact business in the state may be made on the corporation by service on the commissioner;

a post office address to which the commissioner may mail a copy of a process against the corporation that may be served on the commissioner;

additional information necessary or appropriate to enable the commissioner to determine and assess unpaid fees payable as prescribed in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.570.
Form and execution of application for withdrawal.

The application for withdrawal shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the commissioner and shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary, or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the application shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by the receiver or trustee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 37 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.575.
Filing of application for withdrawal.

Duplicate originals of the application for withdrawal shall be delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the application conforms to the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

endorse on each duplicate original the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of withdrawal and affix the other duplicate original to it.

The certificate of withdrawal, together with the duplicate original of the application for withdrawal affixed by the commissioner shall be returned to the corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.580.
Effect of certificate of withdrawal.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of withdrawal, the authority of the corporation to transact business in the state ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.585.
Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority.

The certificate of authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in the state may be revoked by the commissioner when

the corporation fails to file its biennial report within the time required by this chapter, or fails to pay fees or penalties prescribed in this chapter when they are due and payable;

the corporation fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state;

the corporation fails, after change of its registered office or registered agent, to file with the commissioner a statement of the change as required by this chapter;

the corporation fails to file with the department an amendment to its articles of incorporation or articles of merger within the time prescribed by this chapter;

a misrepresentation has been made of a material matter in an application, report, affidavit, or other document submitted under this chapter; or

the corporation is 90 days delinquent in filing a notice of change of an officer or director as required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am §§ 58, 59 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.590.
Limitations on revocation of certificate of authority.

The commissioner may not revoke a certificate of authority of a foreign corporation unless

the commissioner has given the corporation at least 60 days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered office in the state; and

the corporation fails, before revocation, to file the biennial report, or pay the fees, or file the required statement of change of registered agent or registered office, or file the articles of amendment or articles of merger, or correct the misrepresentation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 21 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 10.20.595.
Issuance of certificate of revocation.

Upon revoking a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall

issue a certificate of revocation in duplicate;

file one of the certificates in the commissioner’s office;

mail to the corporation at its registered office in the state a notice of the revocation accompanied by one of the certificates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.600.
Effect of certificate of revocation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of revocation, the authority of the corporation to transact business in the state ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.605.
Transacting business without certificate of authority as a bar to right to sue.

A foreign corporation transacting business in the state without a certificate of authority may not maintain an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of the state until it obtains a certificate of authority. A successor or assignee of a foreign corporation transacting business without a certificate of authority may not maintain an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of the state on a right, claim, or demand arising out of the transaction of business by the corporation in the state until a certificate of authority is obtained by the corporation or by a corporation that has acquired all or substantially all of its assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.610.
Transacting business without certificate of authority not affecting validity of contract or act, and right to defend.

The failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority to transact business in the state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of it, and does not prevent the corporation from defending an action, suit, or proceeding in a court of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.615.
Liability to state for transacting business without certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation that transacts business in the state without a certificate of authority is liable to the state, for the years or portions of years during which it transacted business in the state without a certificate of authority, in an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by this chapter on the corporation if it had applied for and received a certificate of authority to transact business in the state as required by this chapter and filed all reports required by this chapter, plus all penalties imposed by this chapter for failure to pay the fees and a penalty of up to $5,000 per year or fraction of a year of operating without a certificate of authority.
The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover amounts due the state under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 46 ch 170 SLA 1976)